Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 115. Veterinary Pharmaceuticals

§ 1731.
Sale, distribution, or use.

A person, firm, or corporation other than a licensed veterinarian shall not sell, trade, distribute, or use in this State any product containing live germs, cultures, or virulent products for the treatment of any domestic animal without first obtaining written authorization from the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

In no case may a person, firm, or corporation, including licensed veterinarians, use or possess virulent live virus hog cholera vaccine.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 6

;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 1732.
Penalties.

A person, firm, or corporation who violates a provision of section 1731 of this title shall be assessed an administrative penalty under section 15 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2017, No. 30

, § 6.

§§ 1733-1736.
Repealed. 2017, No. 30, § 6.